Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 1. Interstate Compact on Juveniles

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of juvenile escape statutes, 46 ALR5th 523.

Treatment, under Federal Juvenile Delinquency Act (18 USCS §§ 5031-5042), of juvenile alleged to have violated law of United States, 137 ALR Fed 481.

§ 14-6-101.
[Repealed.]

Repealed pursuant to Laws 2004, ch. 91, § 2; see §

14-6-102

.

Contingent repeal. —

Laws 2004, ch. 91, § 2, provides that
W.S.

14-6-101

is repealed, effective upon certification by the governor of the state of Wyoming to the Wyoming secretary of state that at least thirty-four (34) other states have enacted the Interstate Compact for Juveniles. See
The Council on State Governments website, updated June 29, 2009, which indicates the Compact has now been adopted by thirty-nine (39) states. http://csg-web.csg.org/programs/ncic/InterstateCompactforJuveniles.aspx